Massachusetts, session 194th, H974.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there is hereby
established within the executive office of energy and environmental affairs a Solar Panel
Recycling Advisory Group to review and advise the legislature on policies pertaining to the
recovery and recycling of solar panel infrastructure sold and used within the commonwealth. The
advisory group shall consult with local universities and research institutions that have conducted
research in the area of solar panel infrastructure recycling, manufacturers of solar photovoltaic
panels, and the recycling industry.
SECTION 2. The advisory group shall consist of: the secretary of energy and
environmental affairs, or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of
environmental protection, or a designee; one member of the toxics use reduction institute; the
executive director of the Massachusetts clean energy center, or their designee; 3 members to be
appointed by the governor; 1 member of the senate to be appointed by the senate president; 1
of 2

member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker; 1 member of the senate
appointed by the senate minority leader; and 1 member of the house of representatives to be
appointed by the house minority leader.
SECTION 3. The Solar Panel Recycling Advisory Group shall submit its final report of
the findings and recommendations to the executive office of energy and environmental affairs;
the department of environmental protection; the joint committee on environment, natural
resources and agriculture; and the clerks of the senate and the house of representatives no later
than 1 year after the passage of this bill.
of 2